Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3342
State Disbursement Unit; created.

There is hereby created a State Disbursement Unit for the statewide collection and disbursement of support order payments. The State Disbursement Unit shall be administered and operated directly by a public or private entity or state officer as designated by the Title IV-D Division. The designation shall be subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the Legislature. The entity or officer as designated shall be directly responsible to the Title IV-D Division.

In employing initial staff for the unit, a hiring preference shall be given to employees of the clerks of the district court.

Laws 1999, LB 637, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 29.